North Dakota, session 69, SB2207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 57-40.3-04 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. a. Any motor vehicle procured by, owned by, or in possession of the:
(1) The federal orgovernment;
(2) The state government or a;
(3) A political subdivision thereofof this state;
(4) A tribal government of a federally recognized Indian tribe within the boundaries of
any reservation in this state; or a motor vehicle procured by or
(5) A person on behalf of the North Dakota lottery thatwhen the motor vehicle is to be
awarded as a prize in a game or promotion.
b. For purposes of this subsection, an "Indian tribe" means a tribal government agency,
instrumentality, or political subdivision that performs essential government functions. The
term does not include a business entity or agency with the primary purpose of operating
a business enterprise.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable events occurring after June 30,
2025.

S. B. NO. 2207 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2207.
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 3 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 15 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State